Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-208
Unauthorized change; corrective action authorized.

If the commission finds that a telecommunications company has violated section 86-205, the commission shall order the telecommunications company to take corrective action as necessary and consistent with 47 C.F.R. 64.1150, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2002, and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission.

Laws 1999, LB 150, § 8;

Laws 2001, LB 389, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-1908;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 70.